California, session 20252026, AB718.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 66014.9 is added to the Education Code, to read:66014.9. The California State University shall, and the University of California is requested to, include in admission notifications both of the following:(a) A hyperlink to the university’s internet website that contains the labor market outcome information, as described in Section 66014.3.(b) Information on student loans, including both of the following:(1) The federal student loans statement required in all printed and online financial aid materials issued or distributed by the institution to applicants for admission or matriculated students, as described in Section 69800.(2) (A) An explanation that public and private student loans have a range of interest rates and fees.(B) The explanation described in subparagraph (A) shall include a hypothetical example that illustrates how different payment schedules can impact the total interest paid by the student for the life of the loan.SECTION 1.Section 66014.9 is added to the Education Code, to read:66014.9.(a)The California State University shall, and the University of California is requested to, include on admission letters the average salary data and average student loan payment data specific to the admitted student’s intended area of study, as specified in subdivisions (b) and (c).(b)For the academic years of 2026–27 to 2031–32, inclusive, the data provided pursuant to subdivision (a) shall reflect the systemwide average salary and loan payment data for graduates in the admitted student’s intended area of study.(c)Beginning with the 2032–33 academic year, the data provided pursuant to subdivision (a) shall reflect the average salary and loan payment data specific to the admitted student’s intended area of study, disaggregated by campus.(d)Data collected pursuant to Section 66014.3 may be used to fulfill the requirements of this section.(e)Data collected or provided for purposes of this section shall adhere to all applicable state and federal privacy laws.